Florida, session 2026, SB1646.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSubsections (1) and (2) and paragraph (e) of 31 subsection (6) of section 1013.64, Florida Statutes, are amended 32 to read: 33 1013.64âFunds for comprehensive educational plant needs; 34 construction cost maximums for school district capital 35 projects.âAllocations from the Public Education Capital Outlay 36 and Debt Service Trust Fund to the various boards for capital 37 outlay projects shall be determined as follows: 38 (1)(a)âFunds for remodeling, renovation, maintenance, 39 repairs, and site improvement for existing satisfactory 40 facilities shall be given priority consideration by the 41 Legislature for appropriations allocated to the boards from the 42 total amount of the Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt 43 Service Trust Fund appropriated. These funds must shall be 44 calculated pursuant to the following basic formula: the building 45 value multiplied by times the building age and divided by over 46 the most current sum of the yearsâ digits report. These 47 calculations assume assuming a 50-year building life span for 48 permanent. For modular noncombustible facilities, a 35-year 49 building life span for modular noncombustible facilities shall 50 be used, and for relocatable facilities, a 20-year building life 51 span for relocatable facilities shall be used. The âbuilding 52 valueâ is calculated by multiplying each buildingâs total 53 assignable square feet by times the appropriate net-to-gross 54 conversion rate found in state board rules and multiplying that 55 product by times the current average new construction cost. The 56 âbuilding ageâ is calculated by multiplying the prior yearâs 57 building age by times 1 minus the prior yearâs sum received from 58 this subsection divided by the prior yearâs building value and 59 then adding. to the net result shall be added the number 1. Each 60 board shall receive the percentage generated by the preceding 61 formula of the total amount appropriated for the purposes of 62 this section. 63 (b)âEach board is prohibited from using the funds received 64 pursuant to this section to supplant funds in the current fiscal 65 year approved operating budget, and all budgeted funds must 66 shall be expended at a similar rate not less than the amount 67 that would have been expended had the funds under this section 68 not been received. 69 (c)âEach remodeling, renovation, maintenance, repair, or 70 site improvement project will expand or upgrade current 71 educational plants to prolong the useful life of the plant. 72 (d)âEach board shall maintain its fund accounting in a 73 manner which will permit a detailed audit of the funds expended 74 in this program. 75 (e)âRemodeling projects shall be based on the 76 recommendations of a survey pursuant to s. 1013.31. 77 (f)âA board shall prioritize a minimum of At least one 78 tenth of its a boardâs annual allocation provided under this 79 section shall be spent to correct unsafe, unhealthy, or 80 unsanitary conditions in its educational facilities, as required 81 by s. 1013.12, or a lesser amount sufficient to correct all 82 deficiencies cited in its annual comprehensive safety inspection 83 reports. A board may use less than one-tenth of its allocation 84 if that amount satisfies all This paragraph shall not be 85 construed to limit the amount a board may expend to correct such 86 deficiencies. 87 (g)âWhen an existing educational plant is determined to be 88 unsatisfactory pursuant to the survey conducted under s. 89 1013.31, the board may, by resolution, designate the plant as a 90 historic educational facility and may use funds generated for 91 renovation and remodeling pursuant to this section to restore 92 the facility for use by the board. The board shall agree to pay 93 renovation and remodeling costs in excess of funds which such 94 facility would have generated through the depreciation formula 95 in paragraph (a) had the facility been determined to be 96 satisfactory. The board shall further agree that the plant shall 97 continue to house students. The board may designate a plant as a 98 historic educational facility only if the Division of Historical 99 Resources of the Department of State or the appropriate historic 100 preservation board under chapter 266 certifies that: 101 1.âThe plant is listed or determined eligible for listing 102 in the National Register of Historic Places pursuant to the 103 National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, as amended, 16 104 U.S.C. s. 470; 105 2.âThe plant is designated historic within a certified 106 local district pursuant to s. 48(g)(3)(B)(ii) of the Internal 107 Revenue Code; or 108 3.âThe division or historic preservation board otherwise 109 finds that the plant is historically significant. 110 (h)âUniversity boards of trustees may utilize funds 111 appropriated pursuant to this section for replacement of minor 112 facilities. Minor facilities may not be replaced from funds 113 provided pursuant to this section if unless the board determines 114 that the cost of repair or renovation is greater than or equal 115 to the cost of replacement. 116 (2)(a)âThe department shall establish, as a part of the 117 Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund, a 118 separate account, in an amount determined by the Legislature, to 119 be known as the âSpecial Facility Construction Account.â The 120 Special Facility Construction Account shall be used to provide 121 necessary construction funds to school districts which have 122 urgent construction needs but which lack sufficient resources at 123 present, and cannot reasonably anticipate sufficient resources 124 within the period of the next 3 years, for these purposes from 125 currently authorized sources of capital outlay revenue. A school 126 district requesting funding from the Special Facility 127 Construction Account shall submit one specific construction 128 project, not to exceed one complete educational plant, to the 129 Special Facility Construction Committee. A district may not 130 receive funding for more than one approved project in any 3-year 131 period or while any portion of the districtâs participation 132 requirement is outstanding. The first year of the 3-year period 133 shall be the first year a district receives an appropriation. 134 The department shall encourage a construction program that 135 reduces the average size of schools in the district. The request 136 must meet the following criteria to be considered by the 137 committee: 138 1.âThe project must be deemed a critical need and must be 139 recommended for funding by the Special Facility Construction 140 Committee. Before developing construction plans for the proposed 141 facility, the district school board must submit an application 142 via letter to request a preapplication review by the Special 143 Facility Construction Committee Chair or the Director of 144 Educational Facilities or a project review subcommittee convened 145 by the chair of the committee to include two representatives of 146 the department and two staff members from school districts not 147 eligible to participate in the program. A school district may 148 apply request a preapplication review at any time; however, if 149 the district school board seeks inclusion in the departmentâs 150 next annual capital outlay legislative budget request, the 151 district must apply preapplication review request must be made 152 before February 1. Within 90 days after receiving the 153 application preapplication review request, the committee or 154 subcommittee must meet in the school district to review the 155 project proposal and existing facilities. The committee or 156 subcommittee, convened by the committee chair, must include two 157 representatives from the department and two staff members from 158 school districts not eligible to participate in the program. To 159 determine whether the proposed project is a critical need, the 160 committee or subcommittee shall consider, at a minimum, the 161 capacity of all existing facilities within the district as 162 determined by the Florida Inventory of School Houses; the 163 districtâs pattern of student growth; the districtâs existing 164 and projected capital outlay full-time equivalent student 165 enrollment as determined by the demographic, revenue, and 166 education estimating conferences established in s. 216.136; the 167 districtâs existing satisfactory student stations; the use of 168 all existing district property and facilities; grade level 169 configurations; and any other information that may affect the 170 need for the proposed project. 171 2.âThe construction project must be recommended in the most 172 recent survey or survey amendment cooperatively prepared by the 173 district and the department, and approved by the department 174 under the rules of the State Board of Education. If a district 175 employs a consultant in the preparation of a survey or survey 176 amendment, the consultant may not be employed by or receive 177 compensation from a third party that designs or constructs a 178 project recommended by the survey. 179 a.3.âThe construction project must appear on the districtâs 180 approved project priority list under the rules of the State 181 Board of Education. 182 b.4.âThe district must have selected and have an had 183 approved a site for the construction project in compliance with 184 ss. 1013.33 and 1013.36 s. 1013.36 and the rules of the State 185 Board of Education. 186 c.âThe district must have developed a district school 187 board-adopted list of facilities that do not exceed the norm for 188 net square feet occupancy requirements under the State 189 Requirements for Educational Facilities, using all possible 190 programmatic combinations for multiple uses of space to obtain 191 maximum daily use of all spaces within the facility under 192 consideration. 193 3.a.âThe department shall participate in the design review 194 process in compliance with ss. 1013.04 and 1013.41. If at any 195 time during the design phase the Office of Educational 196 Facilities determines a project goes beyond the scope of the 197 original requested project, to include changing site location, 198 and the request is not corrected, the project is disqualified 199 from the program and the district must reapply. 200 b.âThe department shall conduct construction site visits 201 throughout the construction process in compliance with s. 202 1013.04. 203 5.âThe district shall have developed a district school 204 board adopted list of facilities that do not exceed the norm for 205 net square feet occupancy requirements under the State 206 Requirements for Educational Facilities, using all possible 207 programmatic combinations for multiple use of space to obtain 208 maximum daily use of all spaces within the facility under 209 consideration. 210 4.6.âUpon construction, the total cost per student station, 211 including change orders, must not exceed the cost per student 212 station as provided in subsection (6) unless approved by the 213 Special Facility Construction Committee. At the discretion of 214 the committee, costs that exceed the cost per student station 215 for special facilities may include legal and administrative 216 fees, the cost of site improvements or related offsite 217 improvements, the cost of complying with public shelter and 218 hurricane hardening requirements, cost overruns created by a 219 disaster as defined in s. 252.34(2), costs of security 220 enhancements approved by the school safety specialist, and 221 unforeseeable circumstances beyond the districtâs control. 222 5.7.âThere shall be an agreement signed by the district 223 school board and kept on file with the department stating that 224 it will advertise for bids no later than within 30 days after of 225 receipt of its encumbrance authorization for design and 226 construction from the department. 227 6.âThe selection of an architect and construction manager 228 will be as follows: 229 a.âWhen selecting an architect and a construction manager 230 through the âRequest for Qualificationsâ or âRequest for 231 Proposals,â the district shall use the process developed by the 232 department, including scoresheets, submittal requirements, and 233 selection process. The department shall collect and review all 234 selection documentation and may provide feedback or take action 235 in the selection process, up to and including overriding the 236 boardâs selection and making a new selection. 237 b.âDistrict school boards may enter into a contingency 238 construction contract for the full construction amount initially 239 requested at the Special Facilities Construction Account 240 Committee meeting or the final Guaranteed Maximum Price, 241 whichever is higher. The contract must have a clause stating 242 that subsequent years are contingent on funding. 243 c.âAn elected state official may not participate in the 244 selection process other than approving the selection committeeâs 245 recommendation. 246 7.8.âFor construction projects for which Special Facilities 247 Construction Account funding is sought before the 2019-2020 248 fiscal year, the district shall, at the time of the request and 249 for a continuing period necessary to meet the districtâs 250 participation requirement, levy the maximum millage against its 251 nonexempt assessed property value as allowed in s. 1011.71(2) or 252 shall raise an equivalent amount of revenue from the school 253 capital outlay surtax authorized under s. 212.055(6). Beginning 254 with construction projects for which Special Facilities 255 Construction Account funding is sought in the 2019-2020 fiscal 256 year and thereafter, the district shall, for a minimum of 3 257 years before applying for a special facilities project 258 submitting the request and for a continuing period necessary to 259 meet its participation requirement, levy the maximum millage 260 against the districtâs nonexempt assessed property value as 261 authorized under s. 1011.71(2) or shall raise an equivalent 262 amount of revenue from the school capital outlay surtax 263 authorized under s. 212.055(6). Any district with a new or 264 active project, funded under the provisions of this subsection, 265 shall be required to budget no more than the value of 1 mill per 266 year to the project until the districtâs participation 267 requirement of its maximum relating to the local discretionary 268 capital improvement millage pursuant to s. 1011.71(2) for 3 269 years or the equivalent amount of revenue from the school 270 capital outlay surtax is satisfied. 271 8.9.âIf a construction contract has not been signed 120 90 272 days after the advertising of bids, the funding for the specific 273 project must shall revert to the Special Facility New 274 Construction Account to be reallocated to other projects on the 275 list. However, an additional 60 90 days may be granted by the 276 commissioner. 277 9.10.âThe department shall certify the inability of the 278 district to fund the survey-recommended project over a 279 continuous 3-year period using projected capital outlay revenue 280 derived from s. 9(d), Art. XII of the State Constitution, as 281 amended, paragraph (3)(a) of this section, and s. 1011.71(2). 282 10.11.âThe district shall have on file with the department 283 an adopted resolution acknowledging its commitment to satisfy 284 its participation requirement, which is equivalent to all 285 unencumbered and future revenue acquired from s. 9(d), Art. XII 286 of the State Constitution, as amended, paragraph (3)(a) of this 287 section, and s. 1011.71(2), in the year of the initial 288 appropriation and for the 2 years immediately following the 289 initial appropriation. 290 11.a.12.âPhase I plans must be approved by the district 291 school board as being in compliance with the building and life 292 safety codes before June 1 of the year the application is made. 293 (b)âThe Special Facility Construction Committee shall be 294 composed of the following: two representatives of the Department 295 of Education, a representative from the Governorâs office, a 296 representative selected annually by the district school boards, 297 and a representative selected annually by the superintendents. A 298 representative of the department shall chair the committee. 299 b.(c)âThe committee shall review the requests submitted 300 from the districts, evaluate the ability of the project to 301 relieve critical needs, and rank the requests in priority order. 302 This statewide priority list for special facilities construction 303 shall be submitted to the Legislature in the commissionerâs 304 annual capital outlay legislative budget request at least 45 305 days prior to the legislative session. 306 (6) 307 (e)âNotwithstanding the requirements of this subsection, an 308 unfinished construction project for new construction of 309 educational plant space which that was started on or before July 310 1, 2030 2028, is exempt from the total cost per student station 311 requirements established in paragraph (b). 312 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 313 1013.62, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 314 1013.62âCharter schools capital outlay funding.â 315 (3)âIf the school board levies the discretionary millage 316 authorized in s. 1011.71(2), the department shall use the 317 following calculation methodology to determine the amount of 318 revenue that a school district must distribute to each eligible 319 charter school: 320 (a)âReduce the total discretionary millage revenue by the 321 school districtâs annual debt service obligation incurred as of 322 March 1, 2017, which has not been subsequently retired, and any 323 amount of participation requirement pursuant to s. 324 1013.64(2)(a)7. s. 1013.64(2)(a)8. that is being satisfied by 325 revenues raised by the discretionary millage. 326 327 By October 1 of each year, each school district shall certify to 328 the department the amount of debt service and participation 329 requirement that complies with the requirement of paragraph (a) 330 and can be reduced from the total discretionary millage revenue. 331 The Auditor General shall verify compliance with the 332 requirements of paragraph (a) and s. 1011.71(2)(e) during 333 scheduled operational audits of school districts. 334 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.